Wisconsin, session 2025, SB309.
do enact as follows:SB309,1Section 1. 256.35 (7) (c) of the statutes is created to read:256.35 (7) (c) 1. In this paragraph, “national crisis hotline” means the telephone or text access number “988,” or its successor, that is maintained under the federally administered program under 42 USC 290bb-36c.2. Any public safety answering point or dispatcher that transfers a caller to the national crisis hotline is immune from civil liability for any outcomes resulting from the transfer.3. Subdivision 2. does not apply if the injury claimed to have resulted from the transfer is the result of an act or omission that constitutes gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct by the dispatcher or public safety answering point. Down Down /2025/related/enrolled/sb309 true enrolledbills /2025/related/enrolled/sb309 enrolledbills/2025/REG/SB309 enrolledbills/2025/REG/SB309 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Enrolled Legislation»SB309: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting